District of Columbia statutes.
42-1705

Written listing contract required.

A written listing contract is required in the District for the sale of all real property. A licensee shall not receive payment of a commission in the absence of a written listing agreement.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-209, § 26, 30 DCR 390
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-242, § 3(3), 44 DCR 1128
1981 Ed., § 45-1945.